Maine, session 132, LD818.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2017, c. 31, §1, is further
amended to read:
6. Restrictions on contributions and expenditures for certified candidates. After
certification, a candidate must shall limit the candidate's campaign expenditures and
obligations, including outstanding obligations, to the revenues distributed to the candidate
from the fund and may not accept any contributions unless specifically authorized by the
commission. Candidates may also accept and spend interest earned on fund revenues in
campaign bank accounts. All revenues distributed to a certified candidate from the fund
must be used for campaign-related purposes. The candidate, the treasurer, the candidate's
committee authorized pursuant to section 1013‑A, subsection 1 or any agent of the
candidate and committee may not use these revenues for any but campaign-related
purposes. The candidate, the treasurer, the candidate's committee authorized pursuant to
section 1013‑A, subsection 1 or any agent of the candidate and committee may not use
these revenues for post-election parties. This section does not prohibit a candidate from
using personal funds for post-election parties as governed by rules of the commission. The
commission shall publish guidelines outlining permissible campaign-related expenditures.
For the purposes of this section, "campaign-related purposes" includes paid caregiving
services provided to the candidate or the candidate's spouse or domestic partner for the
direct care of a dependent family member and for which the need for paid caregiving
services is directly connected with the candidate's campaign activities during the election
cycle and would not exist except for the candidate's campaign.